Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1 Tennessee Securities Act of 1980
48-1-110. Registration procedure.

A broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative may obtain an initial or renewal registration by filing with the commissioner or the commissioner's designee an application, together with a consent to service of process pursuant to § 48-1-124(e), and by paying any reasonable costs charged by the designee for processing such filings.

The application shall be on such form and contain such information as the commissioner by rule requires concerning such matters as:

The applicant's form and place of organization;

The applicant's proposed method of doing business;

The qualifications and business history of the applicant and, if appropriate, the qualifications and business history of any affiliate, partner, officer, director, or any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions for the applicant;

Any injunction or administrative order or conviction of a misdemeanor involving a security or any aspect of the securities business and any conviction of a felony; and

The applicant's financial condition and history.

The commissioner may by rule require an applicant for initial registration to publish an announcement of the application in one (1) or more specified newspapers published in this state.

If no denial order is in effect and no proceeding is pending under § 48-1-112, such registration becomes effective at twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, central time, of the thirtieth day after a completed application is filed. The commissioner may by rule or order specify an earlier effective date, and may by order defer the effective date until twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, central time, of the thirtieth day after the filing of any amendment.

Registration of a broker-dealer automatically constitutes registration of any partner, officer, or director of the broker-dealer, or a person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions.

Every applicant for initial or renewal registration shall pay a nonrefundable filing fee of two hundred dollars ($200) in the case of a broker-dealer, fifty dollars ($50.00) in the case of an agent, two hundred dollars ($200) in the case of an investment adviser, and fifty dollars ($50.00) in the case of an investment adviser representative.

A registered broker-dealer or investment adviser may file an application for registration of a successor, whether or not the successor is then in existence, for the unexpired portion of the year. There shall be no filing fee for the registration of any successor.

The commissioner may by rule require a minimum net capital for registered broker-dealers and investment advisers.

The commissioner may by rule require registered broker-dealers, agents, investment advisers, and investment adviser representatives to post surety bonds in amounts up to ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or reasonable fidelity bonds, and may determine their conditions. Any appropriate deposit of cash or securities shall be accepted in lieu of any surety bond so required. No surety bond may be required of any registrant whose net capital, which may be defined by rule, exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). Every surety bond shall provide coverage of any suit thereon by any person who has a cause of action under § 48-1-122 and, if the commissioner by rule requires, by any person who has a cause of action not arising under this part. No suit may be maintained to enforce any liability on any bond unless brought within two (2) years after the sale or other act upon which such suit is based.

Any person who is included in the definition of “issuer” by virtue of § 48-1-102(15)(A)(iii) shall register as an issuer-dealer unless either:

Such person sells less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per year in undivided fractional interests in oil, gas, or other mineral interests in any twelve-month period; or

Such person contributes money or services for lease acquisition and drilling or mining activities on property covered by the undivided fractional interests in proportion to the person's interest in the proceeds from such activities on the same basis as all purchasers of undivided fractional interests. For purposes of this subdivision (f)(1)(B), services shall be valued at the fair market value of similar services and at competitive rates, and such value shall be established prior to the sale of any interests.

An issuer-dealer is not deemed to be a “broker-dealer” and is not subject to regulation other than as provided by this subsection (f) and rules permitted hereby so long as its securities business is restricted to the sale of undivided fractional interests.

The commissioner shall by rule provide the forms for application and renewal as an issuer-dealer, the term of the registration, and fees for initial application and renewal which shall not exceed those provided by subsection (b) for broker-dealers.

Registration as an issuer-dealer shall be effective thirty (30) days after receipt of a completed application and the appropriate fee, if any, unless denial proceedings are instituted or unless an earlier effective date is granted by order of the commissioner. The registration may be denied, revoked, or suspended if such action is in the public interest and if the applicant or any affiliate, partner, officer, director, or any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions:

Has filed an application for registration which included any untrue statement of a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;

Has been convicted within the past ten (10) years of any misdemeanor involving any aspect of the securities business or an investment-related business, or any felony;

Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the securities business or any investment-related business; or

Is the subject of any order entered within the past ten (10) years by any agency of any jurisdiction having regulatory authority with respect to the securities business or any investment-related business, denying, revoking, or suspending a registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or the substantial equivalent of those terms as defined in this part, or ordering such person to cease and desist from continuing any conduct or practice involving any investment-related transaction based on fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation, or applicable law similar to § 48-1-121(a) and (b).

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 10; 1983, ch. 312, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-16-110; Acts 1985, ch. 26, § 3; 1989, ch. 15, §§ 1, 2; 2001, ch. 61, § 11; 2002, ch. 550, §§ 6-8; T.C.A., § 48-2-110; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 30-32.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-110 was transferred to § 48-1-110 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N.L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

48-1-111. Records and reports — Examinations.

Every registered broker-dealer and investment adviser shall make and keep such accounts, correspondence, memoranda, papers, books, and other records as the commissioner by rule prescribes. All records so required shall be preserved for three (3) years unless the commissioner by rule prescribes otherwise for particular types of records.

Every registered broker-dealer and investment adviser shall file such financial reports and other documents as the commissioner by rule prescribes.

If the information contained in any document filed with the commissioner is or becomes inaccurate or incomplete in any material respect, the registrant shall promptly file a correcting amendment.

All the records referred to in subsection (a) are subject at any time and from time to time to such reasonable periodic, special, or other examinations, within or outside of this state, by representatives of the commissioner, as the commissioner deems necessary or appropriate in the public interest or for the protection of investors.

The cost of such examination shall be borne by the person examined and shall include the expenses of the commissioner or the commissioner's deputy and the expenses and compensation of the commissioner's assistants employed in the examination; provided, that not more than two (2) such examinations shall be charged to such person in any twelve-month period.

For the purpose of avoiding unnecessary duplication of examinations, the commissioner, insofar as the commissioner deems it practicable in administering this subsection (d), may cooperate with the securities administrators of other states, the securities and exchange commission, any national securities exchange or national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as amended, or any securities administrators' association.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 11; T.C.A., § 48-16-111; T.C.A., § 48-2-111; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 33, 34.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-111 was transferred to § 48-1-111 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

48-1-112. Denial, revocation, suspension, cancellation, or withdrawal of registration.

The commissioner may by order deny, suspend, or revoke any registration under this part if the commissioner finds that:

The order is in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors; and

The applicant or registrant or, in the case of a broker-dealer or investment adviser, any affiliate, partner, officer, director, or any person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions:

Has filed an application for registration which as of its effective date, or as of any date after filing in the case of an order denying effectiveness, includes any untrue statement of a material fact or omits to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;

Has willfully violated or willfully failed to comply with any provision of this part or a predecessor chapter or any rule or order under this part or a predecessor chapter, including, without limitation, any net capital requirements;

Has been convicted of any felony, or within the previous ten (10) years has been convicted of a misdemeanor involving a security or any aspect of the securities business or any investment-related business;

Is permanently or temporarily enjoined by any court of competent jurisdiction from engaging in or continuing any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the securities business or any investment-related business;

Is the subject of an order of the commissioner denying, suspending, or revoking any registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or ordering any person to cease and desist from violating any provision of this part;

(a) Is the subject of any order entered within the past ten (10) years by the securities administrator of any other jurisdiction or by the securities and exchange commission or any other federal or state agency having jurisdiction over investment-related businesses:

Denying or revoking any registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, or the substantial equivalent of those terms as defined in this part; or

Is the subject of an order suspending or expelling such person from a national securities exchange or national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as amended, or is the subject of a United States post office fraud order;

The following provisions govern the application of subdivision (a)(2)(I):

The commissioner may not enter an order against a broker-dealer on the basis of the lack of qualification of any person other than:

The broker-dealer personally if the broker-dealer is an individual;

A general partner, officer, director, or controlling person of such broker-dealer; or

An agent of such broker-dealer;

The commissioner may not enter an order against an investment adviser on the basis of the lack of qualification of any person other than:

The investment adviser personally if the investment adviser is an individual;

A general partner, officer, director, or controlling person of such investment adviser; or

An investment adviser representative;

The commissioner may not enter an order solely on the basis of lack of experience if the applicant or registrant is qualified by training or knowledge or both;

The commissioner shall consider that an agent who will work under the supervision of a registered broker-dealer need not have the same qualifications as such broker-dealer;

The commissioner shall consider that an investment adviser is not necessarily qualified solely on the basis of experience as a broker-dealer or agent. When the commissioner finds that an applicant for registration (including a renewal of an effective registration) as a broker-dealer is not qualified as an investment adviser, the commissioner may by order condition the applicant's registration as a broker-dealer upon the registrant's not transacting business in this state as an investment adviser;

The commissioner may by rule provide for an examination, which may be written or oral or both, to be taken by any class of or all applicants for registration as a broker-dealer or investment adviser, as well as persons who represent or will represent a broker-dealer or an investment adviser in doing any broker-dealer or investment adviser activities;

The commissioner shall consider that an investment adviser representative who will work under the supervision of a registered investment adviser need not have the same qualification as such investment adviser;

In any case in which the commissioner is authorized to deny, revoke, or suspend the registration of a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, investment adviser representative, or applicant for broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative registration, the commissioner may, in lieu of or in addition to such disciplinary action, impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for all violations for any single transaction, or in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation if an individual who is a designated adult is a victim.

Pending final determination whether or not any registration under this section shall be revoked, the commissioner may by order suspend such registration, if after notice and opportunity for hearing, the commissioner finds such suspension to be in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors.

Upon such terms and conditions as the commissioner deems in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors, any registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative may withdraw from registration by filing a written notice of withdrawal with the commissioner or by filing a notice of withdrawal through a designated filing depository.

Withdrawal from registration as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative becomes effective thirty (30) days after receipt of an application to withdraw or within such shorter period of time as the commissioner by rule or order may permit.

If the commissioner finds that any registered broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative is no longer in existence or has ceased to do business as a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative, the commissioner shall by order cancel the registration of such broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser, or investment adviser representative.

Ordering such person to cease and desist from any conduct or practice involving any aspect of the securities business or any investment-related business based on findings of fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation or violations of laws similar to § 48-1-121(a) or (b); or

The commissioner may not either:

Institute a revocation or suspension proceeding under this subdivision (a)(2)(F) more than one (1) year from the date of the order relied on as long as the registrant notified the commissioner within thirty (30) days of the date of the order; or

Enter an order under this subdivision (a)(2)(F) on the basis of an order under another jurisdiction's act unless that order was based on facts which would currently constitute a ground for an order denying or revoking registration under this part, or is based on findings of fraud, deceit, misrepresentation or violations of law similar to § 48-1-121(a) and (b);

Has engaged in dishonest or unethical practices in the securities business;

Is insolvent, either in the sense that the applicant's liabilities exceed its assets or in the sense that it cannot meet its obligations as they mature; provided, that the commissioner may not enter an order against a broker-dealer or investment adviser under this subdivision (a)(2)(H) without a specific finding that the broker-dealer or investment adviser is insolvent;

Is not qualified on the basis of such factors as training, experience, and knowledge of the securities business, except as otherwise provided in subsection (c);

Has failed reasonably to supervise such person's agents if the person is a broker-dealer, or such person's investment adviser representatives if the person is an investment adviser; or

Has failed to pay any required fee; provided, that the commissioner shall vacate any such order when the deficiency has been corrected.

The commissioner may not institute a revocation or suspension proceeding under subsection (a) based solely on material facts actually known by the commissioner unless an investigation or the revocation or suspension proceeding is instituted within one (1) year after the commissioner actually acquires knowledge of the material facts.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 12; 1983, ch. 312, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., § 48-16-112; Acts 1986, ch. 596, § 3; 2001, ch. 61, §§ 12, 13; 2002, ch. 550, §§ 9-17; 2007, ch. 272, §§ 1, 2; 2010, ch. 697, § 2; 2010, ch. 829, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-2-112; Acts 2017, ch. 424, §§ 35, 36.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-112 was transferred to § 48-1-112 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

SEC Injunctions, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (2001).

48-1-113. Filing of sales and advertising literature.

The commissioner may by rule require the filing of any prospectus, pamphlet, circular, form letter, advertisement, or other sales literature or advertising communication addressed or intended for distribution to prospective investors, including clients or prospective clients of an investment adviser.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 13; T.C.A., § 48-16-113; T.C.A. § 48-2-113; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 37.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-113 was transferred to § 48-1-113 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

48-1-114. Unlawful representation concerning registration or exemption.

Neither the fact that an application for registration or notice filing under §§ 48-1-109 - 48-1-112 or a registration statement or notice filing under §§ 48-1-104 - 48-1-108 or § 48-1-125 has been filed, nor the fact that a person or security is effectively registered, constitutes a finding by the commissioner that any document filed under this part is true, complete, and not misleading.

Neither any such fact nor the fact that an exemption or exception is available for a security or transaction means that the commissioner has passed in any way upon the merits or qualifications of, or that the commissioner has recommended or given approval to, any person, security, or transaction.

Any representation to the contrary is unlawful.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 14; T.C.A., § 48-16-114; Acts 1997, ch. 164, § 5; T.C.A. § 48-2-114; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 38.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-114 was transferred to § 48-1-114 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

48-1-115. Administration.

The administration of this part shall be vested in the commissioner. The commissioner, as authorized by the governor, shall appoint a director or assistant commissioner of securities and may delegate to such director or assistant commissioner of securities, by rule, such of the commissioner's powers and duties hereunder as are appropriate for the protection of investors and the efficient administration of this part.

The commissioner has the authority to employ attorneys, auditors, examiners, investigative agents, clerks and stenographers and other professional and clerical employees as the proper administration of this part may require.

The commissioner, or any persons employed by the commissioner, shall be paid, in addition to their regular compensation, the transportation fare, board, lodging, and other traveling expenses necessary and actually incurred by each of them in the performance of their duties under this part.

The revenues collected by the commissioner under this part are for the purpose of defraying a portion of the expenses incurred by the commissioner in the administration of this part. Such fees shall be payable in addition to other fees and taxes now required by law and shall be expendable receipts for the use of the commissioner in defraying a portion of the cost of the administration of this part.

It is unlawful for the commissioner or any of the commissioner's officers or employees to use for personal benefit any information which is filed with or obtained by the commissioner and which is not made public. No provision of this part authorizes the commissioner or any of the commissioner's officers or employees to disclose any such information except among themselves or when necessary or appropriate in a proceeding or investigation under this part.

No provision of this part either creates or derogates from any privilege which exists at common law or otherwise when documentary or other evidence is sought under a subpoena directed to the commissioner or any of the commissioner's officers or employees.

The commissioner may designate filing depositories for all records required to be filed and maintained under this part. These records may be maintained in original form or by means of microfilm, microfiche, microphotographic reproduction, photographic reproduction, word processing, computerization, or other acceptable reproductive methods.

The commissioner is further authorized to participate, in whole or in part, in the Central Registration Depository systems Web Central Registration Depository (Web CRD) and Web Investment Advisers Registration Depository (IARD), in cooperation with the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority (FINRA) or any successor regulatory entity, the North American Securities Administrators Association (NASAA), other states, the United States, and other entities, to the extent the commissioner deems participation as being in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors.

The commissioner is further authorized to participate, in whole or in part, in securities registration depository systems, in cooperation with NASAA, other states, the United States, and other entities, to the extent the commissioner deems participation as being in the public interest and necessary for the protection of investors.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 15; T.C.A., § 48-16-115; Acts 1985, ch. 26, § 4; 1996, ch. 1072, § 7; 2001, ch. 61, § 14; 2010, ch. 697, §§ 1, 3; T.C.A. § 48-2-115; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 39.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-115 was transferred to § 48-1-115 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

Cross-References. Appointment of personnel by commissioner, § 4-4-106.

Reorganization of divisions, § 4-4-101.